Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1846
Bondholders and trustee; enforcement of rights.

Any holder of bonds or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto issued under the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights given in the act may be restricted by the authorizing resolution or trust agreement, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state, the act, or such trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by the act or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by any officer, employee, or agent thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, rents, fees, and charges authorized in the act and required by the provisions of such resolution or trust agreement to be fixed, established, and collected.

Such rights shall include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the authority required by the act or the bond resolution or trust agreement to enjoin unlawful activities and, in the event of default with respect to the payment of any principal of and premium, if any, and interest on any bond or in the performance of any covenant or agreement on the part of the authority in the bond resolution, to apply to a court having jurisdiction of the cause to appoint a receiver to administer and operate a project, the revenue of which is pledged to the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, with full power to pay and to provide for payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, and with such powers, subject to the direction of the court, as are permitted by law and are accorded receivers in general equity cases, excluding any power to pledge additional revenue of the authority to the payment of such principal, premium, and interest, and to foreclose the mortgage on the project in the same manner as the foreclosure of a mortgage on real estate of private corporations.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 46.